Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 17 Representative Offices and Registration

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, effective July 1, 1995, repealed the Code section formerly codified at this part and enacted the current part.
The former part consisted of Code Section 7-1-590 and was based on Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8 (Code enactment Act) and Ga. L. 1985, p. 246, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 458, § 7; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 7.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Applications, registrations and notifications, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-1-1.

7-1-590.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Bank” and “bank holding company” shall have the same meaning as in Part 18 of this article. A “banking business” is the business which a bank is authorized to do pursuant to this title. The power to receive deposits or the performance of any transaction directly or through an affiliate or agent relative to a deposit account shall be presumed to constitute a banking business.

“Deposit production office” means a form of a representative office with the authority to solicit deposits, provide information about deposit products, and assist consumers to complete the application forms to open deposit accounts, provided that such office does not open deposit accounts, take deposits, or conduct any other banking business.

“Domicile” means the home state as defined in paragraph (12) of Code Section 7-1-621 where a bank is chartered or where a bank holding company is incorporated.

“Loan production office” is a form of a representative office, where the solicitation of loans or of leases of personal property may occur, but not the closing of loans, the disbursement of loan proceeds, nor any other banking business. It shall be established and registered as a representative office.

“Representative office” is an office established by a bank, a bank holding company, or an agent or subsidiary of either for the purpose of conducting business activities other than a banking business and includes, but is not limited to, deposit production offices, loan production offices, and trust production offices. It shall not be considered to be a branch office or main office.

“Trust production office” means a trust sales office of a qualifying individual or corporate fiduciary which office is not performing fiduciary activities. Sales activities shall consist primarily of marketing or soliciting in this state using mail, telephone, or electronic means or in person to act or propose to act as a fiduciary.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-590

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 23; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 19; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 16; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 11/HB 780; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 11/HB 891.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, inserted “business activities” in the first sentence of paragraph (4). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added paragraph (2), redesignated former paragraphs (2) through (5) as paragraphs (3) through (6), inserted “closing of loans, the” in paragraph (4), added “and includes, but is not limited to, deposit production offices, loan production offices, and trust production offices” at the end of the first sentence in paragraph (5), and in paragraph (6), deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The trust institution desiring to establish such an office in this state must apply to the department on forms provided by the department, must be approved by the commissioner to engage in sales activities in this state, and must register and pay any fees required for a representative office under Code Section 7-1-593.”, deleted “outside of this state” from the end of the present second sentence, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The department shall be permitted to examine such trust production offices to ascertain whether they are limiting their activities as prescribed.”

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, “means” was substituted for “shall mean” in the first sentence in paragraph (5).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2022, a comma was added following “loan proceeds” in the first sentence of paragraph (4).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-591.
Establishment of representative office by bank or bank holding company domiciled in state; out-of-state activities.

A bank domiciled in this state and operating under the laws of this state or a subsidiary of such bank may establish a representative office anywhere in the state upon registering with the department. A bank holding company domiciled in this state and operating under the laws of this state or a nonbank subsidiary of such bank holding company may establish a representative office anywhere in this state upon registering with the department.

Subject to any limitation or restrictions of the host state and upon registering the representative office with the department, a Georgia chartered bank may conduct any activities at any representative office outside Georgia that are authorized by Georgia law or that are permissible for a bank chartered by the host state where the representative office is located, except to the extent such activities are expressly prohibited by the laws of this state or by any regulation or order of the commissioner applicable to the Georgia chartered bank and except where the activity is one that requires approval from the department, in which case such approval must be secured; provided, however, that the commissioner may waive any prohibition or requirement for approval if he or she determines, by order or regulation, that the involvement of out-of-state representative offices of the Georgia chartered bank in particular activities would not threaten the safety or soundness of such bank.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-591

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 23; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 16; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-8/HB 811; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 5/HB 781; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 12/HB 891.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “or agent” following “subsidiary” twice in subsection (a).

Cross references.

Requirement of maintenance of registered office by financial institutions in state, §

7-1-132

.

7-1-592.
Establishment of representative office by bank or holding company domiciled in state or outside of state; conformance with requirements of primary regulator; permissible activities.

A bank or bank holding company domiciled in this state and operating under the laws of the United States or domiciled outside this state and operating under the laws of such other state or territory or of the United States, or its subsidiary, may establish representative offices anywhere in this state, provided that such bank or bank holding company conforms to the requirements of its primary regulator. The permissible activities conducted at such a representative office are governed by federal law if the bank is a national bank or by the law of the state or territory where the bank is domiciled if chartered by another state, except to the extent such activities are expressly prohibited by the laws of this state or by any regulation of the commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-592

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 23; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 16; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-9/HB 811; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 13/HB 891.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “or agent” following “subsidiary” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

Cross references.

Requirement of maintenance of registered office by financial institutions in state, §

7-1-132

.

7-1-593.
Notification of bank representative office closure.

Prior to closing a representative office, a bank, bank holding company, or a subsidiary of a bank or bank holding company shall post notice of the closing as required by Code Section 7-1-110.1.

The department may review the operations of any representative office annually or at such greater frequency as it deems necessary to assure that the office does not transact a banking business.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-593

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 23; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 16; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-10/HB 811; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 6/HB 781; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 14/HB 891.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted the present provisions of subsection (a) for the former provisions, which read: “A bank or bank holding company domiciled in this state and having a representative office located in this state shall register with the department annually on forms prescribed by the department. Such registration shall be filed according to regulations issued by the department and shall list the names of all its Georgia representative offices, the street address of the offices, the nature of the business to be transacted in or through the offices, and such other information as the department may require. The department may consolidate these requirements with the holding company registration required in Parts 18, 19, and 20 of this article.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, rewrote subsection (a), which read: “A bank or bank holding company domiciled in this state and having a representative office shall register such representative office with the department. Prior to closing a representative office, such bank or bank holding company must post notice of the closing as required by Code Section 7-1-110.1.”

7-1-594.
[Repealed] Registration of banks or bank holding companies conducting agency relationships.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-594

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 23; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-11/HB 811, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 7(6)/HB 323, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, repealed the reservation of this Code section.